Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1568XS (3) 91 cm/jh S.F. 190 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 659B.1 Definitions. 1 For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context 2 otherwise requires: 3 1. âCommunicationâ means factual information related to 4 an incident of sexual assault, harassment, or discrimination 5 experienced by the individual making the communication, 6 including any of the following: 7 a. An act of sexual harassment, as described in section 8 708.7, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (5). 9 b. An act of workplace harassment or discrimination, failure 10 to prevent an act of workplace harassment or discrimination, 11 aiding, abetting, inciting, compelling, or coercing an 12 act of workplace harassment or discrimination, or an act 13 of retaliation against a person for reporting or opposing 14 workplace harassment or discrimination. 15 c. An act of sexual harassment. 16 d. An act of harassment or discrimination, or an act of 17 retaliation against a person for reporting harassment or 18 discrimination. 19 e. An act of cyber sexual bullying. 20 2. âCyber sexual bullyingâ means the dissemination of, or 21 the solicitation or incitement to disseminate, a sexual image 22 by a student to another student or to school personnel by means 23 of an electronic act that has or can be reasonably predicted to 24 have one or more of the following effects: 25 a. Placing a reasonable student in fear of harm to that 26 studentâs person or property. 27 b. Causing a reasonable student to experience a 28 substantially detrimental effect on the studentâs physical or 29 mental health. 30 c. Causing a reasonable student to experience substantial 31 interference with the studentâs academic performance. 32 d. Causing a reasonable student to experience substantial 33 interference with the studentâs ability to participate in or 34 benefit from the services, activities, or privileges provided 35 -1- LSB 1568XS (3) 91 cm/jh 1/ 7 S.F. 190 by a school. 1 3. âSexual harassmentâ means unwelcome sexual advances, 2 requests for sexual favors, and other verbal, visual, or 3 physical conduct of a sexual nature, made by someone from or 4 in the work or educational setting, under any of the following 5 conditions: 6 a. Submission to the conduct is explicitly or implicitly 7 made a term or a condition of an individualâs employment, 8 academic status, or progress. 9 b. Submission to, or rejection of, the conduct by the 10 individual is used as the basis of employment or academic 11 decisions affecting the individual. 12 c. The conduct has the purpose or effect of having a 13 negative impact upon the individualâs work or academic 14 performance, or of creating an intimidating, hostile, or 15 offensive work or educational environment. 16 d. Submission to, or rejection of, the conduct by the 17 individual is used as the basis for any decision affecting 18 the individual regarding benefits and services, honors, 19 programs, or activities available at or through the educational 20 institution. 21 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 659B.2 Incidents of sexual assault, 22 harassment, or discrimination ââ privileged communications. 23 1. A communication made by a person who has or had a 24 reasonable basis to file a complaint of sexual assault, 25 harassment, or discrimination regarding the communication, 26 whether or not the complaint was filed, shall not be liable for 27 libel or slander if the communication was made without malice. 28 2. If a defamation action is brought against a person who 29 made such a privileged communication, the defendant may apply 30 for expedited review pursuant to section 659B.3. 31 3. A prevailing defendant in any civil action brought 32 pursuant to chapter 659 for making a communication that 33 is privileged under this section is entitled to all of the 34 following: 35 -2- LSB 1568XS (3) 91 cm/jh 2/ 7 S.F. 190 a. Reasonable attorney fees and costs. 1 b. Noneconomic damages for any harm caused to the defendant 2 by the libel or slander action. 3 c. Punitive damages. 4 d. Any other relief otherwise permitted by law. 5 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 659B.3 Special motion for expedited 6 relief. 7 Not later than sixty days after a party is served with a 8 petition, crossclaim, counterclaim, third-party claim, or other 9 pleading that asserts a cause of action to which this chapter 10 applies, or at a later time on a showing of good cause, the 11 party may file a special motion for expedited relief to dismiss 12 the cause of action or part of the cause of action. 13 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 659B.4 Stay. 14 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 through 15 7, on the filing of a motion under section 659B.3, all of the 16 following apply: 17 a. All other proceedings between the moving party and 18 responding party, including discovery and a pending hearing or 19 motion, are stayed. 20 b. On motion by the moving party, the court may stay a 21 hearing or motion involving another party, or discovery by 22 another party, if the hearing or ruling on the motion would 23 adjudicate, or the discovery would relate to, an issue material 24 to the motion under section 659B.3. 25 2. A stay under subsection 1 remains in effect until entry 26 of an order ruling on the motion under section 659B.3 and 27 expiration of the time under section 659B.9 for the moving 28 party to appeal the order. 29 3. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5, 6, and 30 7, if a party appeals from an order ruling on a motion under 31 section 659B.3, all proceedings between all parties in the 32 action are stayed. The stay remains in effect until the 33 conclusion of the appeal. 34 4. During a stay under subsection 1, the court may allow 35 -3- LSB 1568XS (3) 91 cm/jh 3/ 7 S.F. 190 limited discovery if a party shows that specific information is 1 necessary to establish whether a party has satisfied or failed 2 to satisfy a burden under section 659B.7, subsection 1, and 3 the information is not reasonably available unless discovery 4 is allowed. 5 5. A motion under section 659B.10 for costs, attorney fees, 6 and expenses is not subject to a stay under this section. 7 6. A stay under this section does not affect a partyâs 8 ability to voluntarily dismiss a cause of action or part of a 9 cause of action or move to sever a cause of action. 10 7. During a stay under this section, the court for good 11 cause may hear and rule on all of the following: 12 a. A motion unrelated to the motion under section 659B.3. 13 b. A motion seeking a special or preliminary injunction to 14 protect against an imminent threat to public health or safety. 15 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 659B.5 Hearing. 16 1. The court shall hear a motion under section 659B.3 not 17 later than sixty days after filing of the motion, unless the 18 court orders a later hearing for any of the following: 19 a. To allow discovery under section 659B.4, subsection 4. 20 b. For other good cause. 21 2. If the court orders a later hearing under subsection 1, 22 paragraph âaâ , the court shall hear the motion under section 23 659B.3 not later than sixty days after the court order allowing 24 the discovery, unless the court orders a later hearing under 25 subsection 1, paragraph âbâ . 26 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 659B.6 Proof. 27 In ruling on a motion under section 659B.3, the court shall 28 consider the pleadings, the motion, any reply or response to 29 the motion, and any evidence that could be considered in ruling 30 on a motion for summary judgment under rule of civil procedure 31 1.981. 32 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 659B.7 Dismissal of cause of action 33 in whole or part. 34 1. In ruling on a motion under section 659B.3, the court 35 -4- LSB 1568XS (3) 91 cm/jh 4/ 7 S.F. 190 shall dismiss with prejudice a cause of action, or part of a 1 cause of action, if any of the following are true: 2 a. The responding party fails to establish a prima facie 3 case as to each essential element of the cause of action. 4 b. The moving party establishes that any of the following: 5 (1) The responding party failed to state a cause of action 6 upon which relief can be granted. 7 (2) There is no genuine issue as to any material fact and 8 the moving party is entitled to judgment as a matter of law on 9 the action or part of an action. 10 2. A voluntary dismissal without prejudice of a responding 11 partyâs cause of action, or part of a cause of action, that is 12 the subject of a motion under section 659B.3 does not affect a 13 moving partyâs right to obtain a ruling on the motion and seek 14 costs, attorney fees, and expenses under section 659B.10. 15 3. A voluntary dismissal with prejudice of a responding 16 partyâs cause of action, or part of a cause of action, that is 17 the subject of a motion under section 659B.3 establishes for 18 the purpose of section 659B.10 that the moving party prevailed 19 on the motion. 20 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 659B.8 Ruling. 21 The court shall rule on a motion under section 659B.3 not 22 later than sixty days after a hearing under section 659B.5. 23 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 659B.9 Appeal. 24 A moving party may appeal as a matter of right from an order 25 denying, in whole or in part, a motion under section 659B.3. 26 The appeal must be filed not later than thirty days after entry 27 of the order. 28 Sec. 10. NEW SECTION . 659B.10 Costs, attorney fees, and 29 expenses. 30 On a motion under section 659B.3, the court shall award court 31 costs, reasonable attorney fees, and reasonable litigation 32 expenses related to the motion in the following circumstances: 33 1. To the moving party if the moving party prevails on the 34 motion. 35 -5- LSB 1568XS (3) 91 cm/jh 5/ 7 S.F. 190 2. To the responding party if the responding party prevails 1 on the motion and the court finds that the motion was frivolous 2 or filed solely with intent to delay the proceeding. 3